test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ndiko_gt-norm.yaml
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg2+OcSg1: dindikona
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcSg1: dondikona
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl2+OcSg1: deundikona
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcSg1: degindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1+OcSg2: dandikoni
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcSg2: dondikoni
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl1+OcSg2: dewandikoni
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcSg2: degindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1+OcSg3: dandikone
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg2+OcSg3: dindikone
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcSg3: dondikone
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl1+OcSg3: dewandikone
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl2+OcSg3: deundikone
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcSg3: degindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1+OcPl1: dandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg2+OcPl1: dindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcPl1: dondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl2+OcPl1: deundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcPl1: degindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1+OcPl2: dandikou
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcPl2: dondikou
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl1+OcPl2: dewandikou
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcPl2: degindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1+OcPl3: dandikogi
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg2+OcPl3: dindikogi
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3+OcPl3: dondikogi
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl1+OcPl3: dewandikogi
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl2+OcPl3: deundikogi
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3+OcPl3: degindikogi
## Present subjunctive I should write
# oneg/onego
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1: onegandiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg2: onegindiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3: onegondiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl1: onegowandiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl2: onegoundiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3: onegogindiko

     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: onegindikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: onegondikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: onegoundikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: onegogindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: onegandikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: onegondikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: onegowandikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: onegogindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: onegandikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: onegindikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: onegondikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: onegowandikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: onegoundikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: onegogindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl1: onegandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: onegindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: onegondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: onegoundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: onegogindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: onegandikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: onegondikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: onegowandikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: onegogindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: onegandikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: onegindikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: onegondikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: onegowandikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: onegoundikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: onegogindikogi
## Past Subjunctive I should have written
# noneg/nonego
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1: nonegandiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg2: nonegindiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3: nonegondiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl1: nonegowandiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl2: nonegoundiko
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3: nonegogindiko

     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg1: nonegindikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg1: nonegondikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg1: nonegoundikona
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg1: nonegogindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg2: nonegandikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg2: nonegondikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg2: nonegowandikoni
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg2: nonegogindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: nonegandikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: nonegindikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: nonegondikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: nonegowandikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: nonegoundikone
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: nonegogindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl1: nonegandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl1: nonegindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl1: nonegondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl1: nonegoundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl1: nonegogindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl2: nonegandikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl2: nonegondikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl2: nonegowandikou
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl2: nonegogindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: nonegandikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: nonegindikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: nonegondikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: nonegowandikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: nonegoundikogi
     ndiko+V+Subj+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: nonegogindikogi
## Indicative Present negative
# ok%<
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1: okandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg2: okindiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3: okondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl1: okwandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl2: okundiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3: okgindiko

     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg2+OcSg1: okindikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcSg1: okondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl2+OcSg1: okundikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcSg1: okgindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1+OcSg2: okandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcSg2: okondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl1+OcSg2: okwandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcSg2: okgindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1+OcSg3: okandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg2+OcSg3: okindikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcSg3: okondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl1+OcSg3: okwandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl2+OcSg3: okundikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcSg3: okgindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1+OcPl1: okandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg2+OcPl1: okindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcPl1: okondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl2+OcPl1: okundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcPl1: okgindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1+OcPl2: okandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcPl2: okondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl1+OcPl2: okwandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcPl2: okgindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg1+OcPl3: okandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg2+OcPl3: okindikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScSg3+OcPl3: okondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl1+OcPl3: okwandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl2+OcPl3: okundikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrsNeg+ScPl3+OcPl3: okgindikogi

## Indicative Future negative I will not write
# ok%<PERSON%<be
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1: okabendiko
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg2: okibendiko
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3: okobendiko
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl1: okwabendiko
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl2: okubendiko
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3: okgibendiko

     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg2+OcSg1: okibendikona
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcSg1: okobendikona
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl2+OcSg1: okubendikona
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcSg1: okgibendikona
#
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1+OcSg2: okabendikoni
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcSg2: okobendikoni
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl1+OcSg2: okwabendikoni
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcSg2: okgibendikoni
#
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1+OcSg3: okabendikone
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg2+OcSg3: okibendikone
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcSg3: okobendikone
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl1+OcSg3: okwabendikone
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl2+OcSg3: okubendikone
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcSg3: okgibendikone
#
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1+OcPl1: okabendikonwa
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg2+OcPl1: okibendikonwa
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcPl1: okobendikonwa
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl2+OcPl1: okubendikonwa
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcPl1: okgibendikonwa
#
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1+OcPl2: okabendikou
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcPl2: okobendikou
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl1+OcPl2: okwabendikou
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcPl2: okgibendikou
#
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg1+OcPl3: okabendikogi
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg2+OcPl3: okibendikogi
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScSg3+OcPl3: okobendikogi
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl1+OcPl3: okwabendikogi
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl2+OcPl3: okubendikogi
     bendiko+V+Ind+FutNeg+ScPl3+OcPl3: okgibendikogi

## Indicative Past negative
# n%<ok%<
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1: nokandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg2: nokindiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3: nokondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl1: nokwandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl2: nokundiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3: nokgindiko

     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg2+OcSg1: nokindikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg1: nokondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl2+OcSg1: nokundikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg1: nokgindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1+OcSg2: nokandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg2: nokondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl1+OcSg2: nokwandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg2: nokgindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1+OcSg3: nokandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg2+OcSg3: nokindikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg3: nokondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl1+OcSg3: nokwandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl2+OcSg3: nokundikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg3: nokgindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl1: nokandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg2+OcPl1: nokindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl1: nokondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl2+OcPl1: nokundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl1: nokgindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl2: nokandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl2: nokondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl1+OcPl2: nokwandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl2: nokgindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl3: nokandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg2+OcPl3: nokindikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl3: nokondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl1+OcPl3: nokwandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl2+OcPl3: nokundikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+PrtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl3: nokgindikogi

## Imperative/Jussive negative
# ok%<
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1: kikandik
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg2: kikindik
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3: kikondik
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl1: kikwandik
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl2: kikundik
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3: kikgindik

     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg2+OcSg1: kikindikona
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg1: kikondikona
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl2+OcSg1: kikundikona
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg1: kikgindikona
#
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1+OcSg2: kikandikoni
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg2: kikondikoni
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl1+OcSg2: kikwandikoni
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg2: kikgindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1+OcSg3: kikandikone
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg2+OcSg3: kikindikone
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcSg3: kikondikone
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl1+OcSg3: kikwandikone
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl2+OcSg3: kikundikone
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcSg3: kikgindikone
#
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl1: kikandikonwa
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg2+OcPl1: kikindikonwa
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl1: kikondikonwa
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl2+OcPl1: kikundikonwa
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl1: kikgindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl2: kikandikou
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl2: kikondikou
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl1+OcPl2: kikwandikou
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl2: kikgindikou
#
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg1+OcPl3: kikandikogi
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg2+OcPl3: kikindikogi
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScSg3+OcPl3: kikondikogi
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl1+OcPl3: kikwandikogi
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl2+OcPl3: kikundikogi
     ndiko+V+ImprtNeg+ScPl3+OcPl3: kikgindikogi
